Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.533

Contracts with common school districts for occupational and academic programs for high school students—Enrollment opportunities—Interlocal agreements.

Community and technical colleges may contract with local common school districts to provide occupational and academic programs for high school students. Common school districts whose students currently attend vocational-technical institutes shall not suffer loss of opportunity to continue to enroll their students at technical colleges.

For the purposes of this section, "opportunity to enroll" includes, but is not limited to, the opportunity of common school districts to enroll the same number of high school students enrolled at each vocational-technical institute during the period July 1, 1989, through June 30, 1990, and the opportunity for common school districts to increase enrollments of high school students at each technical college in proportion to annual increases in enrollment within the school districts participating on September 1, 1991. Technical colleges shall offer programs which are accessible to high school students to at least the extent that existed during the period July 1, 1989, through June 30, 1990, and to the extent necessary to accommodate proportional annual growth in enrollments of high school students within school districts participating on September 1, 1991. Accommodating such annual increases in enrollment or program offerings shall be the first priority within technical colleges subject to any enrollment or budgetary restrictions. Technical colleges shall not charge tuition or student services and activities fees to high school students enrolled in the college.

Technical colleges may enter into interlocal agreements with local school districts to provide instruction in courses required for high school graduation, basic skills, and literacy training for students enrolled in technical college programs.

[ 1991 c 238 s 82.]